Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-415
Changes in boundaries; creation of new district; how initiated.

In addition to the petitions of legal voters pursuant to section 79-413, changes in boundaries and the creation of a new school district from other districts may be initiated and accepted by the school board or board of education of any district that is not a member of a learning community.

Laws 1971, LB 468, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 259, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 12;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-402.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 164;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 18;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 25;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 16.

An accepted affiliation petition is not a contract; rather, it creates a new school system. State ex rel. Fick v. Miller, 255 Neb. 387, 584 N.W.2d 809 (1998).